Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
846E

REGISTRATION
OF SEX OFFENDERS AND OTHER COVERED

OFFENDERS
AND Public Access to Registration
Information

Section

846E-1 Definitions

846E-2 Registration requirements

846E-3 Access to registration information

846E-4 Duties upon discharge, parole, or release
of covered

offender

846E-5 Periodic verification of registration
information

846E-6 Requirement to register a change of
registration

information; verification by the attorney
general

846E-7 Notification by the attorney general of
changes in

registration information

846E-8 Good faith immunity

846E-9 Failure to comply with covered offender
registration

requirements

846E-10 Termination of registration requirements

846E-11 Repealed

846E-12 Tolling

846E-13 Repealed

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2005, c 45, §2.

Revision Note

Chapter was enacted as addition to title 37 but was
renumbered pursuant to §23G-15.

In this chapter, subsection, paragraph, and subparagraph designations
are redesignated pursuant to §23G-15(1).

Law Journals and Reviews

When Children Prey on Children: A Look at Hawai‘i's Version
of Megan's Law and its Application to Juvenile Sex Offenders. 20 UH L. Rev.
477 (1998).

Case Notes

Indecent exposure, in violation of §707-734, does not
constitute an offense that entails "criminal sexual conduct" and,
consequently, persons convicted of indecent exposure are not "sex
offenders" for purposes of this chapter; thus, defendant was not required
to register as a "sex offender" pursuant to this chapter. 102 H.
383, 76 P.3d 935 (2003).

Registration requirements under this chapter not cruel and
unusual punishment under article I, §12 of the Hawaii constitution as
registration requirements are not so punitive in nature as to overcome
legislature's remedial purpose. 105 H. 222, 96 P.3d 242 (2004).

The lifetime registration component of the Hawaii sex
offender registration statute implicates a protected liberty interest under the
Hawaii constitution, article I, §5 and requires that minimum requirements of
due process--notice and opportunity to be heard--be afforded to convicted sex
offenders; such a proceeding may be instituted by a sex offender in a special
proceeding. 105 H. 222, 96 P.3d 242 (2004).

This chapter, as applied to defendant, was not grossly
disproportionate to the offenses for which defendant was convicted, as
proportionality is not guaranteed by the Eighth Amendment; the question was
whether the statute itself effects a punishment which was both severe and
unknown to Anglo-American tradition. 105 H. 222, 96 P.3d 242 (2004).

This chapter not violative of ex post facto clause under
Article I, §10 of the U.S. Constitution as legislature's express purpose was
for chapter to be remedial rather than punitive and statutory scheme is not so
punitive as to negate the State's remedial purpose. 105 H. 222, 96 P.3d 242
(2004).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next